Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1669
Appeal.

Any affected person aggrieved by any final order or decision made by the Chief Water Officer pursuant to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act may appeal the order as provided in section 61-207. For purposes of this section, affected person means the applicant or holder of any approvals under the act and any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or water whose interest is or may be impacted in a direct and significant manner by such final order or decision.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 69;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 307.